Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.624

[Art. 76] Persons to be tried or punished.

No person may be tried or punished for any offense provided for in RCW 38.38.628 through 38.38.800, unless he or she was a member of the organized militia at the time of the offense.

[ 2009 c 378 s 22; 1963 c 220 s 75.]